Tennessee statutes. Title 7 Consolidated Governments and Local Governmental Functions and Entities
Part 1

General Provisions

7-21-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Charter Government Unification Act.”

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 101.

Attorney General Opinions. Charter county or unified government may not impose civil service requirements on county school system teachers or employees, OAG 96-104, 1996 Tenn. AG LEXIS 114 (8/14/96).

Unified government with general and urban services districts, OAG 97-041, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 40 (4/7/97).

Voting under the Charter Government Unification Act, OAG 97-096, 1997 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107 (7/1/97).

Adoption of metropolitan government, OAG 06-100 (6/12/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 109.

Voting under Charter Government Unification Act and Metropolitan Government Act. OAG 10-51, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 51 (4/15/10).

7-21-102. Applicability.

This chapter shall apply to the consolidation and unification of the governmental and corporate functions of a county whose voters have adopted county charter government pursuant to article VII, § 1 of the Constitution of Tennessee, with one (1) or more of the municipalities within that county's boundaries.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 102.

7-21-103. Liberal construction — No effect on Metropolitan Government Act.

It is hereby declared that this chapter is remedial and shall be liberally construed to achieve the purposes stated in this chapter by utilization of the constitutional power granted by the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 9 with respect to the consolidation of the governmental and corporate functions of a county charter government with one (1) or more of the municipalities within that county's boundaries.

This chapter shall not be, or be construed as, an amendment to, or as a part of, the Metropolitan Government Act, compiled in chapters 1-8 of this title, but shall be an alternative method to consolidate the governmental and corporate functions of a county government whose charter vests in the county full and complete municipal powers exercisable by home rule, as provided in the Constitution of Tennessee, Article VII, § 1, with one (1) or more municipalities within that county's boundaries, as provided in the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 9.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 103.

7-21-104. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Charter” means a document containing a unified government structure, pursuant to this chapter, that constitutes the fundamental law of the unified government;

“Charter commission” means a commission established to propose the charter to the voters for adoption as provided in this chapter;

“Chief executive officer of the county” means the officer vested by either the county charter or general law with the executive powers of the county government;

“City legislative body” means the city council, board of mayor and aldermen or other body possessing the legislative power and authority of the government of a municipality;

“County” means any county whose voters have adopted a county charter government;

“County legislative body” means that body vested by either the county charter or general law with the legislative powers of the county government;

“Mayor” means such officer vested by either the city charter or general law with the executive powers of a municipality;

“Municipality” means an incorporated city or town located within the boundaries of a county whose voters have adopted a county charter government;

“Participating governmental unit” means a county whose voters have adopted a county charter government or a municipality located within that county's boundaries that has elected to participate in the preparation of a charter pursuant to this chapter;

“Principal city” means that municipality having the largest population of any municipality in a particular county;

“Smaller city” means any municipality within a county other than the principal city;

“Unification” or “unified” means consolidation or consolidated pursuant to this chapter and that power granted by the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 9 to consolidate any or all of the governmental and corporate functions now, or hereafter, vested in a county government with one (1) or more municipalities located within that county's boundaries;

“Unified government” means the governmental entity created by the unification of the governmental and corporate functions of a charter county government with the governmental and corporate functions of one (1) or more municipalities within that county's boundaries; and

“Unified municipality” means a former municipality that has merged into a unified government pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 104.

7-21-105. Unified government permitted — When — Effect of unification.

Each county in this state whose voters have adopted a charter form of government and the principal city within its boundaries may create and establish a unified government to perform all of the governmental and corporate functions now, or hereafter authorized to be, performed by the county government and by the government of the principal city in the manner and with the consequences provided for in this chapter. The government of a smaller city within the county may initially or subsequently merge into the unified government by complying with § 7-21-107 or § 7-21-204(c). Any municipality lying in two (2) or more counties may unify with the county in which the majority of its territory lies.

After unification of a charter county government with a municipality, no functions of the governing bodies of the county and the unified municipality, or of the officers of the governing bodies, shall be retained and continued, unless otherwise so provided either in the charter of the unified government or the Constitution of Tennessee.

After the unification, no officer or agency of the county or the unified municipality shall retain any right, power, duty or obligation, unless so provided either in the charter of the unified government or the Constitution of Tennessee; provided, that nothing contained in this chapter shall impair the rights and obligations of notaries public commissioned according to law by the county prior to unification, and such notaries public shall continue to serve for the remainder of their terms as originally commissioned.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 105.

7-21-106. Creation of charter commission — Effect.

When a charter commission shall be created pursuant to this chapter, no municipality shall thereafter be created in the county, unless and until the proposed charter shall have been rejected by voters in a referendum election as provided in this chapter, or unless and until a charter with express provision permitting such municipality shall have been adopted by the voters in a referendum election as provided in this chapter.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 106.

7-21-107. Smaller cities — Election to become part of unified government.

Any smaller city that has elected not to be initially included in a unified government created and established under this chapter may at any time become a part of the unified government under such terms and conditions and by such methods and procedures as may be established in the charter of the unified government, so long as such unification is accomplished in accordance with the Constitution of Tennessee, Article XI, § 9.

Acts 1991, ch. 497, § 107.